Florida, session 2026, HB109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
1002.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.20 K-12 student and parent rights.—Parents of public
school students must receive accurate and timely information
regarding their child's academic progress and must be informed
of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12
students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory
rights including, but not limited to, the following:
(4) DISCIPLINE.—
(c) Corporal punishment.—A school district employee may
not use 1. In accordance with s. 1003.32, corporal punishment,
as defined in s. 1003.01, on of a public school student may only
be administered by a teacher or school principal within
guidelines of the school principal and according to district
school board policy. Another adult must be present and must be
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 109 2026
informed in the student's presence of the reason for the
punishment. Upon request, the teacher or school principal must
provide the parent with a written explanation of the reason for
the punishment and the name of the other adult who was present.
2. A district school board having a policy authorizing the
use of corporal punishment as a form of discipline shall include
in such policy a requirement that a parent provide consent for
the school to administer corporal punishment. The district
school board policy may require such consent for the school
year, or before each administration. The district school board
shall review its policy on corporal punishment once every 3
years during a district school board meeting held pursuant to s.
1001.372. The district school board shall take public testimony
at the board meeting. If such board meeting is not held in
accordance with this subparagraph, the portion of the district
school board's policy authorizing corporal punishment expires.
Section 2. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section
1003.32, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.32 Authority of teacher; responsibility for control
of students; district school board and principal duties.—Subject
to law and to the rules of the district school board, each
teacher or other member of the staff of any school shall have
such authority for the control and discipline of students as may
be assigned to him or her by the principal or the principal's
designated representative and shall keep good order in the
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 109 2026
classroom and in other places in which he or she is assigned to
be in charge of students.
(1) In accordance with this section and within the
framework of the district school board's code of student
conduct, teachers and other instructional personnel shall have
the authority to undertake any of the following actions in
managing student behavior and ensuring the safety of all
students in their classes and school and their opportunity to
learn in an orderly and disciplined classroom:
(k) Use corporal punishment according to school board
policy and at least the following procedures, if a teacher feels
that corporal punishment is necessary:
1. The use of corporal punishment shall be approved in
principle by the principal before it is used, but approval is
not necessary for each specific instance in which it is used.
The principal shall prepare guidelines for administering such
punishment which identify the types of punishable offenses, the
conditions under which the punishment shall be administered, and
the specific personnel on the school staff authorized to
administer the punishment.
2. A teacher or principal may administer corporal
punishment only in the presence of another adult who is informed
beforehand, and in the student's presence, of the reason for the
punishment.
3. A teacher or principal who has administered punishment
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 109 2026
shall, upon request, provide the student's parent with a written
explanation of the reason for the punishment and the name of the
other adult who was present.
Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph
(b) of subsection (2) of section 1006.07, Florida Statutes, are
amended to read:
1006.07 District school board duties relating to student
discipline and school safety.—The district school board shall
provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the
attendance and control of students at school, and for proper
attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the
welfare of students, including:
(1) CONTROL OF STUDENTS.—
(a) Adopt rules for the control, discipline, in-school
suspension, suspension, and expulsion of students and decide all
cases recommended for expulsion. Suspension hearings are
exempted from the provisions of chapter 120. Expulsion hearings
shall be governed by ss. 120.569 and 120.57(2) and are exempt
from s. 286.011. However, the student's parent must be given
notice of the provisions of s. 286.011 and may elect to have the
hearing held in compliance with that section. The district
school board may prohibit the use of corporal punishment, if the
district school board adopts or has adopted a written program of
alternative control or discipline.
100 (2) CODE OF STUDENT CONDUCT.—Adopt a code of student
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 109 2026
101 conduct for elementary schools and a code of student conduct for
102 middle and high schools and distribute the appropriate code to
103 all teachers, school personnel, students, and parents, at the
104 beginning of every school year. Each code shall be organized and
105 written in language that is understandable to students and
106 parents and shall be discussed at the beginning of every school
107 year in student classes, school advisory council meetings, and
108 parent and teacher association or organization meetings. Each
109 code shall be based on the rules governing student conduct and
110 discipline adopted by the district school board and shall be
111 made available in the student handbook or similar publication.
112 Each code shall include, but is not limited to:
113 (b) Procedures to be followed for acts requiring
114 discipline, including corporal punishment.
115 Section 4. Subsection (5) of section 1012.28, Florida
116 Statutes, is amended to read:
117 1012.28 Public school personnel; duties of school
118 principals.—
119 (5) Each school principal shall perform such duties as may
120 be assigned by the district school superintendent, pursuant to
121 the rules of the district school board. Such rules shall
122 include, but are not limited to, rules relating to
123 administrative responsibility, instructional leadership in
124 implementing the state academic standards and the overall
125 educational program of the school to which the school principal
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 109 2026
126 is assigned, submission of personnel recommendations to the
127 district school superintendent, administrative responsibility
128 for records and reports, administration of corporal punishment,
129 and student suspension.
130 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb109-00